Mississippi, session 2026, HB331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) There is created the Mississippi Curriculum Alignment Task Force to review and make recommendations on how to align the curriculum at the secondary and post-secondary levels throughout the state. (2)  The task force shall be composed of the following members: (a)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board, or his or her designee; (b)  The Superintendent of the Mississippi Department of Education, or his or her designee; (c)  The Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Development, or his or her designee; (d)  Two (2) members who represent the community and junior colleges, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (e)  Two (2) members who represent the Mississippi Department of Education, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (f)  Two (2) members from the Office of Workforce Development, to be appointed by the Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Development; (g)  The Chair of the Mississippi House of Representatives Workforce Development Committee; (h)  The Chair of the Mississippi House of Representatives Education Committee; (i)  The Chair of the Mississippi House of Representatives Universities and Colleges Committee; (j)  The Chair of the Mississippi Senate Economic and Workforce Development Committee; (k)  The Chair of the Mississippi Senate Education Committee; and (l)  The Chair of the Mississippi Senate Universities and Colleges Committee. (3)  The duties of the task force shall include the following: (a)  Study the curriculum at the secondary and post-secondary levels and determine the best ways to align those curriculums so that the best interest of the students are met; (b)  Examine the high school experience and the community college experience and determine what each experience should incorporate; (c)  Analyze the Carnegie units currently required at the secondary level and determine if those properly align with what is best for each student enrolled in this state; (d)  Calculate the funding that would be necessary to properly align the curriculum at the secondary and post-secondary levels; and (e)  Determine what state law changes are needed, if any, to align the curriculum at the secondary and post-secondary levels. (4)  (a)  Appointments to the task force shall be made within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act.  Within fifteen (15) days thereafter on a day to be designated jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor, the task force shall meet and organize by selecting from its membership a chair and a vice chair.  The vice chair shall also serve as secretary and shall be responsible for keeping all records of the task force. A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum.  In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the task force shall be required.  All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, and those notices shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held. (b)  The task force shall meet at least once each month and provide monthly reports to the Legislature on its activities. (c)  The task force shall make a final report of its findings and recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the Legislature not later than December 1, 2026, at which time the task force will be dissolved. (5)  Members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their service on the task force, but may receive reimbursement for mileage and actual expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, to the extent that funds are available for that purpose. (6)  The Mississippi Department of Education shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the task force to perform its duties. (7)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the chairman of the task force, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the task force to carry out its duties. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.